Washington statutes.
RCW 18.100.160

Foreign professional corporation.

A foreign professional corporation may render professional services in this state so long as it complies with chapter 23B.15 RCW and each individual rendering professional services in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state.

[ 1998 c 293 s 7.]